South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S711.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: School crossing guards, traffic control authority, visibility measures, training SECTION 1.    Section 59-63-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-63-60.    (A) No person charged with the responsibility of assisting school children to cross streets near schools shall engage in such activity unless he is attired with some type of garment or equipment that can be clearly seen by the driver of an approaching motor vehicle. (B) A person charged with the responsibility to direct and control traffic on public roadways near schools for the purpose of reducing traffic congestion related to student drop-off or pickup shall be attired with some type of garment or equipment that can be clearly seen by the driver of an approaching motor vehicle and shall receive appropriate training pertaining to traffic safety. (C) The school district official of each school district who is responsible for supervising such personnel shall be responsible for seeing that such persons within his district are furnished with the articles required by this section. The South Carolina Criminal Justice Academy shall provide training to certified law enforcement officers to enable such officers to instruct designated individuals within school districts in the safe direction and control of traffic. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________